Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5508
Agricultural Suppliers Lease Protection Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Agricultural Suppliers Lease Protection Cash Fund is created. All funds collected by the Department of Agriculture under the Agricultural Suppliers Lease Protection Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be used by the department to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2002, LB 435, § 8.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.